Utah statutes.
76-6-705.   Reporting violations.

Every person, except those to whom a statutory or common law privilege applies, who has reason to believe that the provisions of Section 76-6-703 are being or have been violated shall report the suspected violation to the attorney general, or county attorney, or, if within a prosecution district, the district attorney of the county or prosecution district in which part or all of the violations occurred.

